Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.24.131

Withdrawal of candidacy.

A candidate may withdraw the candidate's declaration of candidacy at any time before 5:00 p.m. on the Monday following the last day for candidates to file under RCW 29A.24.050 by filing, with the officer with whom the declaration of candidacy was filed, a signed request that the candidate's name not be printed on the ballot. There shall be no withdrawal period for declarations of candidacy filed during special filing periods held under this title. No filing fee may be refunded to any candidate who withdraws under this section. Notice of the deadline for withdrawal of candidacy and that the filing fee is not refundable shall be given to each candidate at the time the candidate files.

[ 2023 c 394 s 7; 2011 c 349 s 8; 2004 c 271 s 115.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 c 349: See note following RCW 29A.04.255.